Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1763.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2002-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2002-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2014-B. Compliance with Federal tax credit for contributions to scholarship organizations.(a) Designated agency.--In accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 25F(g)(1)(B) (relating to qualified elementary and secondary education scholarships), the department is designated as the agency to make elections on behalf of the Commonwealth with respect to Federal tax benefits related to contributions of individuals to scholarship granting organizations.(b) Notice.--By October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter, the secretary shall transmit a notice to the United States Secretary of the Treasury opting into the Federal tax credit for contributions of individuals to scholarship granting organizations as required under 26 U.S.C. § 25F. The notice shall include a list of the scholarship organizations located in this Commonwealth that meet the requirements for a scholarship granting organization under 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(5).(c) Submission of information.--To assist the department in determining if a scholarship organization meets Federal requirements under 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(5), each scholarship organization shall submit the following information to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, by June 1, 2026, and each June 1 thereafter:(1) Proof that the scholarship organization: (i) is exempt from Federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.); and(ii) maintains one or more separate accounts exclusively for qualified contributions in order to 20250HB1763PN2173 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prevent the comingling of qualified contributions with other amounts.(2) Certification by the scholarship organization that the scholarship organization complies with all of the following:(i) Provides scholarships to 10 or more students who do not all attend the same school.(ii) Spends not less than 90% of the income of the scholarship organization on scholarships for eligible students.(iii) Does not provide scholarships for any expenses other than qualified elementary or secondary education expenses as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 530(b)(3)(A) (relating to Coverdell education savings accounts).(iv) Provides a scholarship to eligible students with a priority for:(A) students awarded a scholarship the previous school year; and(B) after application of clause (A), any eligible students who have a sibling who was awarded a scholarship from the scholarship organization.(v) Does not earmark or set aside contributions for scholarships on behalf of any particular student.(vi) Verifies the annual household income and family size of an eligible student who applies for a scholarship to ensure that the student meets the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(2)(A) and limits the awarding of a scholarship to an eligible student who is a member of a household for which the income does not exceed the amount established under 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(2)(A).20250HB1763PN2173 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Does not award a scholarship to any disqualified person as determined under the rules of 26 U.S.C. § 4946(a) (relating to definitions and special rules).(d) Compliance status.-- (1) By September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall notify each scholarship organization of its compliance status and whether the scholarship organization will be included on the official list submitted to the United States Secretary of the Treasury under subsection (b).(2) After a scholarship organization is initially determined to be compliant under this section, the scholarship organization shall be deemed compliant and remain on the list submitted to the United States Secretary of the Treasury each year.(3) The department may perform random audits to ensure that a scholarship organization remains compliant with this section.(4) If the department determines that a scholarship organization is not compliant with this section, the department may remove the scholarship organization from the list submitted to the United States Secretary of the Treasury.(e) Guidelines.-- (1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, for the implementation of this subsection, the department shall issue guidelines for the implementation of this section.(2) The department may not add requirements to the 20250HB1763PN2173 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guidelines beyond what is required under 26 U.S.C. § 25F.(3) The department shall transmit the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication as a statement of policy in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall post the guidelines on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1763PN2173 - 5 - 1234567